Massachusetts, session 194th, S317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1I of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fifth paragraph the following
paragraph:-
In order for the department to: address educational inequities through a data-driven
approach; report data in a manner that specifies the demographics of students facing the most
significant inequities; and ensure that educational inequities can be effectively identified and
addressed; The department shall annually analyze and publish in an easily accessible and user
friendly manner the student-specific data provided by school committees and charter schools
pursuant to: section 1I of Chapter 69; sections 37G, 2 of 4 10 37H, 37O, 37P, and 89 of Chapter
of 4

71 of the General Laws; sections 3 and 7 of Chapter 71A of the General Laws; section 6 of
Chapter 71B of the General Laws; section 2A of Chapter 72 of the General Laws; statewide
assessment data utilized as a basis for competency determinations pursuant to section 1D of
chapter 69 of the General Laws; and any other data required by the federal office of education,
provided that said data required by the federal department of education is also student-specific
data and can be cross-tabulated. The department shall provide said data in a manner that can be
easily cross-tabulated by, at a minimum, the following student status and categories: racial and
ethnic group; gender; socioeconomic status; high needs status; English learner status; category of
disability; and homeless children and youth, if applicable. The information shall be presented
statewide and also disaggregated by school committee, charter school, and individual school in a
manner that is anonymized and does not reveal personally identifiable information about an
individual student. Publication shall include, but need not be limited to, availability on the
department's worldwide web site.
SECTION 2. Said section 1I of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is further amended by
striking out, in line 239, the word “and”.
SECTION 3. Said section 1I of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “learners”, in line 241, the following words:-- ; and (i) The
number of children, by grade level, within each disability category receiving specific special
education services, including but not limited to: each related service; assistive technology,
including but not limited to augmentative and alternative communication; supplementary aids
and services; positive behavioral interventions and supports; behavioral intervention plans;
vocational education; travel training; and community-based transition 3 of 4 services; provided
further that school districts and charter schools shall only be required to provide said information
of 4

regarding number of children receiving specific special education services when the department
provides school committees with an online web-based IEP application aligned with the special
education services requiring reporting under this section.
SECTION 4. Section 6 of Chapter 71B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following sentences:-
School committees shall also annually report to the department, pursuant to regulations
promulgated by the department, delivery of specific special education services by each major
racial and ethnic group, gender, socioeconomic status, English learner status and whether the
child or youth is homeless by age level, including but not limited to delivery of: each related
service; assistive technology, including but not limited to augmentative and alternative
communication; supplementary aids and services; positive behavioral interventions and supports;
behavioral intervention plans; vocational education; travel training; and community-based
transition services. This annual reporting by school committees to the department shall only be
required when the department provides school committees with an online web-based IEP
application aligned with the special education services requiring reporting under this section.
This information shall be cross-tabulated by, at a minimum, the following student status and
categories: each major racial and ethnic group; gender; socioeconomic status; homeless children
and youth; and English learner status. The information shall be presented statewide and also
disaggregated by school committee, charter school, and individual school in a manner that is
anonymized and does not reveal personally identifiable information about an individual student.
SECTION 5. Said section 6 of said Chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “assignment”, in line 8, the following words:-- or pattern of
delivery of specific special education services. 4 of 4
of 4

SECTION 6. Said section 6 of said Chapter 71B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the word “distribution”, in line 10, the following
words:-- or if there is a statistically significant increase in the rates of assignment of students
with disabilities to substantially separate classrooms for any racial or ethnic group in any of the
10 years following the Governor’s Declaration of a State of Emergency due to COVID-19 in
March 2020, as compared to the 2018-19 school year.
of 4